District of Columbia statutes.
25-802

Examination of premises, books, and records.

(a)

An applicant for a license, and each licensee, shall allow any member of the Board, any ABRA investigator, or any member of the Metropolitan Police Department full opportunity to examine, at any time during business hours:

(1)

The premises where an alcoholic beverage is manufactured, kept, sold, or consumed for which an application for a license has been made or for which a license has been issued; and

(2)

The books and records of the business for which an application for a license has been made or for which a license has been issued.

(b)

ABRA investigators shall examine the premises and books and records of each licensed establishment in the District at least once each year. The investigators shall make reasonable efforts to ensure that the licensee will know in advance the date of the inspection.

History

May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959

Section References

This section is referenced in § 25-101.